South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3286.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 17, Title 47 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 7 Insect-based and Plant-based Meat Section 47-17-710. A person who advertises, offers for sale, or sells all or part of a carcass shall not engage in any misleading or deceptive practices, labeling, or misrepresenting a product as "meat," "clean-meat," or a "meat-food" product that is a plant-based or insect-based food product. Section 47-17-720. A person who violates this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned not more than one year, or fined not more than one thousand dollars, or both. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----